Washington statutes.
RCW 18.54.020

Examining committee reconstituted as optometry board.

The examining committee, heretofore created pursuant to RCW 43.24.060, is reorganized and reconstituted as the optometry board.

[ 1963 c 25 s 2.]

NOTES:

RCW 43.24.060 and 43.24.120 not applicable to optometry: RCW 18.54.920.